Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Accessory dwelling unit” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.501.
(b) “ADU community  pilot program” means one or more programs established, imple-
mented and operated by a nonprofit  organization to invest in developing accessory dwelling
units for eligible homeowners and available for lease by eligible tenants.
(c) “Area median income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 458.610.
(d) “Eligible homeowner” means:
(A) A household that owns and resides in a home and has an  income at or below the area
median income; or
(B) A nonprofit organization, including the organization receiving the a grant under  this
section, that owns a home that is rented to a household with an income at or below the  area
median income.
(e) “Eligible tenant” means a person or household with an income  that is below 60 per-
cent of the area median income.
(f) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization or  group of organizations that is de-
scribed in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code  and is exempt from income tax
under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department shall provide a grant to a nonprofit
organization to fund ADU community pilot programs developed by the  organization or its
subgrantees that must:
(a) Assess the suitability of an eligible homeowner’s property  for siting and construction
of an accessory dwelling unit;
(b) Provide or assist with the financing, documentation, siting, construction  and cleanup
of an accessory dwelling unit on an eligible homeowner’s property;
(c) Identify, screen and enter into lease agreements with eligible tenants who will reside
in accessory dwelling units developed under the  program on an eligible homeowner’s prop-
erty;
(d) Provide professional property management services for the eligible homeowner; and
(e) Require that eligible homeowners maintain the accessory dwelling  units as affordable
to eligible tenants for a period of no less than 10 years.
Enrolled House Bill 3335 (HB 3335-A) Page 1
(3) The nonprofit organization receiving a grant under subsection (2) of  this section may
distribute grant funds to subgrantees that  are nonprofit organizations for ADU community
pilot programs described in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Upon being  awarded a grant under this section, the grant recipient shall enter into
an agreement with the department that:
(a) Indicates the purposes for which the grant funds may be used;
(b) Includes the repayment provisions set forth in subsection (5) of this section;
(c) Permits the department to conduct audits and monitoring  of the grant recipient re-
garding the purposes for which grant funds have been used; and
(d) Requires the grant recipient to report on the use of funds in a manner  described by
the department.
(5)(a) The grant recipient shall repay  to the department, in whole or in part, grant funds
received under this section, to the extent that:
(A) The grant recipient does not use the  grant funds in accordance with the provisions
of the grant agreement executed between the department  and the grant recipient under
subsection (4) of this section; or
(B) The Director of the  Housing and Community Services Department determines that
the grant recipient must repay all or part of  the grant funds on grounds of misappropriation,
fraud or similar reasons after monitoring the grant recipient’s  operations and conducting
an administrative hearing under ORS 183.413 to 183.470.
(b) Funds received by the department under this subsection shall be paid into the State
Treasury and credited to the General Housing Account created under ORS 458.620.
SECTION 1a.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 458.
SECTION 2. No later than September  15, 2023, the Housing and Community Services
Department shall provide a report to an  appropriate interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 on the ADU community  pilot programs
established under section 1 of this 2021 Act, including  the amounts expended and information
reported by the grant recipient.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community  Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to award a grant under section 1
(2) of this 2021 Act to the Hacienda Community Development Corporation.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 3335 (HB 3335-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 21, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3335 (HB 3335-A) Page 3